Nevada, session 83, AB135.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 361.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
361.090 1. The property, to the extent of $2,000 assessed
valuation, of any actual bona fide resident of the State of Nevada
who:
(a) Has served a minimum of 90 continuous days on active duty,
who was assigned to active duty at some time between April 21,
1898, and June 15, 1903, or between April 6, 1917, and
November 11, 1918, or between December 7, 1941, and
-
*AB135*

– 3 –
December 31, 1946, or between June 25, 1950, and May 7, 1975, or
between September 26, 1982, and December 1, 1987, or between
October 23, 1983, and November 21, 1983, or between
December 20, 1989, and January 31, 1990, or between August 2,
1990, and April 11, 1991, or between December 5, 1992, and
March 31, 1994, or between November 20, 1995, and December 20,
1996;
(b) Has served on active duty in connection with carrying out
the authorization granted to the President of the United States in
Public Law 102-1; or
(c) Has served on active duty in connection with a campaign or
expedition for service in which a medal has been authorized by the
Government of the United States, regardless of the number of days
served on active duty,
 and who received, upon severance from service, an honorable
discharge or certificate of satisfactory service from the Armed
Forces of the United States, or who, having so served, is still serving
in the Armed Forces of the United States, is exempt from taxation.
The property, to the extent of $2,000 assessed valuation, of any
actual bona fide resident of the State of Nevada who is the
surviving spouse of a person who satisfied the requirements of
paragraph (a), (b) or (c) and who received, upon severance from
service, an honorable discharge or certificate of satisfactory
service from the Armed Forces of the United States, is exempt
from taxation.
2. For the purpose of this section, the first $2,000 assessed
valuation of property in which an applicant has any interest shall be
deemed the property of the applicant.
3. The exemption may be allowed only to a claimant who files
an affidavit with his or her claim for exemption on real property
pursuant to NRS 361.155. The affidavit may be filed at any time by
a person claiming exemption from taxation on personal property.
4. The affidavit must be made before the county assessor or a
notary public and filed with the county assessor. It must state that
the affiant is a bona fide resident of the State of Nevada who meets
all the other requirements of subsection 1 and that the exemption is
not claimed in any other county in this State. After the filing of the
original affidavit, the county assessor shall, except as otherwise
provided in this subsection, mail a form for:
(a) The renewal of the exemption; and
(b) The designation of any amount to be credited to the Gift
Account for the Veterans Home in Southern Nevada or the Gift
Account for the Veterans Home in Northern Nevada established
pursuant to NRS 417.145,
-
*AB135*

– 4 –
 to the person each year following a year in which the exemption
was allowed for that person. The form must be designed to facilitate
its return by mail by the person claiming the exemption. If so
requested by the person claiming the exemption, the county assessor
may provide the form to the person by electronic means in lieu of by
mail. The county assessor may authorize the return of the form by
electronic means in accordance with the provisions of chapter 719
of NRS.
5. Persons in actual military service are exempt during the
period of such service from filing the annual forms for renewal of
the exemption, and the county assessors shall continue to grant the
exemption to such persons on the basis of the original affidavits
filed. In the case of any person who has entered the military service
without having previously made and filed an affidavit of exemption,
the affidavit may be filed in his or her behalf during the period of
such service by any person having knowledge of the facts.
6. Before allowing any veteran’s exemption pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter, the county assessor shall require proof of
status of the veteran, and for that purpose shall require production of
an honorable discharge or certificate of satisfactory service or a
certified copy thereof, or such other proof of status as may be
necessary.
7. A surviving spouse claiming an exemption pursuant to this
section must file with the county assessor an affidavit declaring
that:
(a) The surviving spouse was married to and living with the
veteran for the 5 years preceding his or her death;
(b) The veteran was eligible for the exemption at the time of
his or her death or would have been eligible if the veteran had
been a resident of the State of Nevada;
(c) The surviving spouse has not remarried; and
(d) The surviving spouse is a bona fide resident of the State of
Nevada.
 The affidavit required by this subsection is in addition to the
certification required pursuant to subsections 4 and 6. After
the filing of the original affidavit required by this subsection, the
county assessor shall, except as otherwise provided in this
subsection, mail a form for the renewal of the exemption to the
person each year following a year in which the exemption was
allowed for that person. The form must be designed to facilitate its
return by mail by the person claiming the exemption. If so
requested by the person claiming the exemption, the county
assessor may provide the form to the person by electronic means
in lieu of by mail. The county assessor may authorize the return of
-
*AB135*

– 5 –
the form by electronic means in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 719 of NRS.
8. If a tax exemption is allowed under this section to a person
who qualifies for the exemption as the surviving spouse of a
veteran, that person is not entitled to an exemption under
NRS 361.080.
9. If any person files a false affidavit or produces false proof to
the county assessor or a notary public and, as a result of the false
affidavit or false proof, the person is allowed a tax exemption to
which the person is not entitled, the person is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.
[8.] 10. Beginning with the 2005-2006 Fiscal Year, the
monetary amounts in subsections 1 and 2 must be adjusted for each
fiscal year by adding to the amount the product of the amount
multiplied by the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index
(All Items) from July 2003 to the July preceding the fiscal year for
which the adjustment is calculated. The Department shall provide to
each county assessor the adjusted amount, in writing, on or before
September 30 of each year.
Sec. 2. NRS 361.091 is hereby amended to read as follows:
361.091 1. A bona fide resident of the State of Nevada who
has incurred a permanent service-connected disability and has been
honorably discharged from the Armed Forces of the United States,
or his or her surviving spouse, is entitled to an exemption.
2. The amount of exemption is based on the total percentage of
permanent service-connected disability. The maximum allowable
exemption for total permanent disability is the first $20,000 assessed
valuation. A person with a permanent service-connected disability
of:
(a) Eighty to 99 percent, inclusive, is entitled to an exemption of
$15,000 assessed value.
(b) Sixty to 79 percent, inclusive, is entitled to an exemption of
$10,000 assessed value.
 For the purposes of this section, any property in which an
applicant has any interest is deemed to be the property of the
applicant.
3. The exemption may be allowed only to a claimant who has
filed an affidavit with his or her claim for exemption on real
property pursuant to NRS 361.155. The affidavit may be made at
any time by a person claiming an exemption from taxation on
personal property.
4. The affidavit must be made before the county assessor or a
notary public and be filed with the county assessor. It must state that
the affiant is a bona fide resident of the State of Nevada, that the
affiant meets all the other requirements of subsection 1 and that the
-
*AB135*

– 6 –
exemption is not claimed in any other county within this State. After
the filing of the original affidavit, the county assessor shall, except
as otherwise provided in this subsection, mail a form for:
(a) The renewal of the exemption; and
(b) The designation of any amount to be credited to the Gift
Account for the Veterans Home in Southern Nevada or the Gift
Account for the Veterans Home in Northern Nevada established
pursuant to NRS 417.145,
 to the person each year following a year in which the exemption
was allowed for that person. The form must be designed to facilitate
its return by mail by the person claiming the exemption. If so
requested by the person claiming the exemption, the county assessor
may provide the form to the person by electronic means in lieu of by
mail. The county assessor may authorize the return of the form by
electronic means in accordance with the provisions of chapter 719
of NRS.
5. Before allowing any exemption pursuant to the provisions of
this section, the county assessor shall require proof of the
applicant’s status, and for that purpose shall require the applicant to
produce an original or certified copy of:
(a) An honorable discharge or other document of honorable
separation from the Armed Forces of the United States which
indicates the total percentage of his or her permanent service-
connected disability;
(b) A certificate of satisfactory service which indicates the total
percentage of his or her permanent service-connected disability; or
(c) A certificate from the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs or any other military document which shows that he or she
has incurred a permanent service-connected disability and which
indicates the total percentage of that disability, together with a
certificate of honorable discharge or satisfactory service.
6. A surviving spouse claiming an exemption pursuant to this
section must file with the county assessor an affidavit declaring that:
(a) The surviving spouse was married to and living with the
veteran who incurred a permanent service-connected disability for
the 5 years preceding his or her death;
(b) The veteran was eligible for the exemption at the time of his
or her death or would have been eligible if the veteran had been a
resident of the State of Nevada;
(c) The surviving spouse has not remarried; and
(d) The surviving spouse is a bona fide resident of the State of
Nevada.
 The affidavit required by this subsection is in addition to the
certification required pursuant to subsections 4 and 5. After the
filing of the original affidavit required by this subsection, the county
-
*AB135*

– 7 –
assessor shall, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, mail
a form for renewal of the exemption to the person each year
following a year in which the exemption was allowed for that
person. The form must be designed to facilitate its return by mail by
the person claiming the exemption. If so requested by the person
claiming the exemption, the county assessor may provide the form
to the person by electronic means in lieu of by mail. The county
assessor may authorize the return of the form by electronic means in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 719 of NRS.
7. If a veteran or the surviving spouse of a veteran submits, as
proof of disability, documentation that indicates a percentage of
permanent service-connected disability for more than one permanent
service-connected disability, the amount of the exemption must be
based on the total of those combined percentages, not to exceed 100
percent.
8. If a tax exemption is allowed under this section to a person
who qualifies for the exemption:
(a) As a veteran with a permanent service-connected disability,
that person is not entitled to an exemption under NRS 361.090.
(b) Solely as the surviving spouse of a veteran with a permanent
service-connected disability, the allowance of a tax exemption under
this section does not affect the eligibility of that person for an
exemption as a veteran under NRS 361.090.
9. If any person files a false affidavit or produces false proof to
the county assessor or a notary public and, as a result of the false
affidavit or false proof, the person is allowed a tax exemption to
which the person is not entitled, the person is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.
10. Beginning with the 2005-2006 Fiscal Year, the monetary
amounts in subsection 2 must be adjusted for each fiscal year by
adding to the amount the product of the amount multiplied by the
percentage increase in the consumer price inflation index from July
2003 to the July preceding the fiscal year for which the adjustment
is calculated. The Department shall provide to each county assessor
the adjusted amount, in writing, on or before September 30 of each
year.
11. For the purposes of this section, “consumer price inflation
index” means the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers,
West Region (All Items), as published by the United States
Department of Labor or, if that index ceases to be published by the
United States Department of Labor, the published index that most
closely resembles that index, as determined by the Department.
Sec. 3. NRS 361.1565 is hereby amended to read as follows:
361.1565 The personal property tax exemption to which a
surviving spouse, person who is blind, veteran , surviving spouse of
-
*AB135*

– 8 –
a veteran, veteran who incurred a service-connected disability or
surviving spouse of a veteran who incurred a service-connected
disability is entitled pursuant to NRS 361.080, 361.085, 361.090 or
361.091 is reduced to the extent that he or she is allowed an
exemption from the governmental services tax pursuant to chapter
371 of NRS.
Sec. 4. NRS 371.103 is hereby amended to read as follows:
371.103 1. Vehicles, to the extent of $2,000 determined
valuation, registered by any actual bona fide resident of the State of
Nevada who:
(a) Has served a minimum of 90 days on active duty, who was
assigned to active duty at some time between April 21, 1898, and
June 15, 1903, or between April 6, 1917, and November 11, 1918,
or between December 7, 1941, and December 31, 1946, or between
June 25, 1950, and May 7, 1975, or between September 26, 1982,
and December 1, 1987, or between October 23, 1983,
and November 21, 1983, or between December 20, 1989, and
January 31, 1990, or between August 2, 1990, and April 11, 1991,
or between December 5, 1992, and March 31, 1994, or between
November 20, 1995, and December 20, 1996;
(b) Has served a minimum of 90 continuous days on active duty
none of which was for training purposes, who was assigned to active
duty at some time between January 1, 1961, and May 7, 1975;
(c) Has served on active duty in connection with carrying out
the authorization granted to the President of the United States in
Public Law 102-1; or
(d) Has served on active duty in connection with a campaign or
expedition for service in which a medal has been authorized by the
Government of the United States, regardless of the number of days
served on active duty,
 and who received, upon severance from service, an honorable
discharge or certificate of satisfactory service from the Armed
Forces of the United States, or who, having so served, is still serving
in the Armed Forces of the United States, is exempt from taxation.
Vehicles, to the extent of $2,000 determined valuation, registered
by any actual bona fide resident of the State of Nevada who is the
surviving spouse of a person who satisfied the requirements of
paragraph (a), (b), (c) or (d), as applicable, and who received,
upon severance from service, an honorable discharge or
certificate of satisfactory service from the Armed Forces of the
United States, are exempt from taxation.
2. In lieu of claiming the exemption from taxation set forth in
subsection 1 in his or her name, a veteran may transfer the
exemption to his or her current spouse. To transfer the exemption,
the veteran must file an affidavit of transfer with the Department in
-
*AB135*

– 9 –
the county where the exemption would otherwise have been
claimed. The affidavit of transfer must be made before an authorized
employee of the Department or a notary public. If a veteran makes
such a transfer:
(a) The spouse of the veteran is entitled to the exemption in the
same manner as if the spouse were the veteran;
(b) The veteran is not entitled to the exemption for the duration
of the transfer;
(c) The transfer expires upon the earlier of:
(1) The termination of the marriage;
(2) The death of the veteran; or
(3) The revocation of the transfer by the veteran as described
in paragraph (d); and
(d) The veteran may, at any time, revoke the transfer of the
exemption by filing with the Department in the county where the
exemption is claimed an affidavit made before an authorized
employee of the Department or a notary public.
3. For the purpose of this section, the first $2,000 determined
valuation of vehicles in which a person described in subsection 1 or
2 has any interest shall be deemed to belong to that person.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a person
claiming the exemption shall file annually with the Department in
the county where the exemption is claimed an affidavit declaring
that he or she is an actual bona fide resident of the State of Nevada
who meets all the other requirements of subsection 1 or 2, as
applicable, and that the exemption is claimed in no other county in
this State. The affidavit must be made before the county assessor or
a notary public. After the filing of the original affidavit of
exemption and after the transfer of the exemption, if any, pursuant
to subsection 2, the county assessor shall, except as otherwise
provided in this subsection, mail a form for:
(a) The renewal of the exemption; and
(b) The designation of any amount to be credited to the Gift
Account for the Veterans Home in Southern Nevada or the Gift
Account for the Veterans Home in Northern Nevada established
pursuant to NRS 417.145,
 to the person who claimed the exemption each year following a
year in which the exemption was allowed for that person. The form
must be designed to facilitate its return by mail by the person
claiming the exemption. If so requested by the person claiming the
exemption, the county assessor may provide the form to the person
by electronic means in lieu of by mail.
5. Persons in actual military service are exempt during the
period of such service from filing annual affidavits of exemption
and the Department shall grant exemptions to those persons on the
-
*AB135*

– 10 –
basis of the original affidavits filed. In the case of any person who
has entered the military service without having previously made and
filed an affidavit of exemption, the affidavit may be filed in his or
her behalf during the period of such service by any person having
knowledge of the facts.
6. Before allowing any veteran’s exemption pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter, the Department shall require proof of
status of the veteran or, if a transfer has been made pursuant to
subsection 2, proof of status of the veteran to whom the person
claiming the exemption is married, and for that purpose shall require
production of an honorable discharge or certificate of satisfactory
service or a certified copy thereof, or such other proof of status as
may be necessary.
7. A surviving spouse claiming an exemption pursuant to this
section must file with the Department in the county where the
exemption is claimed an affidavit declaring that:
(a) The surviving spouse was married to and living with the
veteran for the 5 years immediately preceding his or her death;
(b) The veteran was eligible for the exemption at the time of
his or her death or, if not for the transfer of the exemption
pursuant to subsection 2, would have been eligible for the
exemption at the time of his or her death; and
(c) The surviving spouse has not remarried.
 The affidavit required by this subsection is in addition to the
certification required pursuant to subsections 4 and 6. After
the filing of the original affidavit required by this subsection, the
county assessor shall, except as otherwise provided in this
subsection, mail a form for renewal of the exemption to the person
each year following a year in which the exemption was allowed for
that person. The form must be designed to facilitate its return by
mail by the person claiming the exemption. If so requested by the
person claiming the exemption, the county assessor may provide
the form to the person by electronic means in lieu of by mail.
8. If a tax exemption is allowed under this section to a person
who qualifies for the exemption as the surviving spouse of a
veteran, that person is not entitled to an exemption under
NRS 371.101.
9. If any person files a false affidavit or produces false proof to
the Department, and as a result of the false affidavit or false proof a
tax exemption is allowed to a person not entitled to the exemption,
the person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
[8.] 10. Beginning with the 2005-2006 Fiscal Year, the
monetary amounts in subsections 1 and 3 must be adjusted for each
fiscal year by adding to each amount the product of the amount
multiplied by the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index
-
*AB135*

– 11 –
(All Items) from December 2003 to the December preceding the
fiscal year for which the adjustment is calculated.
Sec. 5. NRS 371.104 is hereby amended to read as follows:
371.104 1. A bona fide resident of the State of Nevada who
has incurred a permanent service-connected disability and has been
honorably discharged from the Armed Forces of the United States,
or his or her surviving spouse, is entitled to a veteran’s exemption
from the payment of governmental services taxes on vehicles of the
following determined valuations:
(a) If he or she has a disability of 100 percent, the first $20,000
of determined valuation.
(b) If he or she has a disability of 80 to 99 percent, inclusive, the
first $15,000 of determined valuation.
(c) If he or she has a disability of 60 to 79 percent, inclusive, the
first $10,000 of determined valuation.
2. In lieu of claiming the exemption from taxation set forth in
subsection 1 in his or her name, a veteran may transfer the
exemption to his or her current spouse. To transfer the exemption,
the veteran must file an affidavit of transfer with the Department in
the county where the exemption would otherwise have been
claimed. The affidavit of transfer must be made before an authorized
employee of the Department or a notary public. If a veteran makes
such a transfer:
(a) The spouse of the veteran is entitled to the exemption in the
same manner as if the spouse were the veteran;
(b) The veteran is not entitled to the exemption for the duration
of the transfer;
(c) The transfer expires upon the earlier of:
(1) The termination of the marriage;
(2) The death of the veteran; or
(3) The revocation of the transfer by the veteran as described
in paragraph (d); and
(d) The veteran may, at any time, revoke the transfer of the
exemption by filing with the Department in the county where the
exemption is claimed an affidavit made before an authorized
employee of the Department or a notary public.
3. For the purpose of this section, the first $20,000 of
determined valuation of vehicles in which a person described in
subsection 1 or 2 has any interest shall be deemed to belong entirely
to that person.
4. A person claiming the exemption shall file annually with the
Department in the county where the exemption is claimed an
affidavit declaring that he or she is a bona fide resident of the State
of Nevada who meets all the other requirements of subsection 1 or
2, as applicable, and that the exemption is claimed in no other
-
*AB135*

– 12 –
county within this State. After the filing of the original affidavit of
exemption and after the transfer of the exemption, if any, pursuant
to subsection 2, the county assessor shall, except as otherwise
provided in this subsection, mail a form for:
(a) The renewal of the exemption; and
(b) The designation of any amount to be credited to the Gift
Account for the Veterans Home in Southern Nevada or the Gift
Account for the Veterans Home in Northern Nevada established
pursuant to NRS 417.145,
 to the person who claimed the exemption each year following a
year in which the exemption was allowed for that person. The form
must be designed to facilitate its return by mail by the person
claiming the exemption. If so requested by the person claiming the
exemption, the county assessor may provide the form to the person
by electronic means in lieu of by mail.
5. Before allowing any exemption pursuant to the provisions of
this section, the Department shall require proof of the veteran’s
status, and for that purpose shall require production of:
(a) A certificate from the Department of Veterans Affairs that
the veteran has incurred a permanent service-connected disability,
which shows the percentage of that disability; and
(b) Any one of the following:
(1) An honorable discharge;
(2) A certificate of satisfactory service; or
(3) A certified copy of either of these documents.
6. A surviving spouse claiming an exemption pursuant to this
section must file with the Department in the county where the
exemption is claimed an affidavit declaring that:
(a) The surviving spouse was married to and living with the
veteran with a disability for the 5 years preceding his or her death;
(b) The veteran with a disability was eligible for the exemption
at the time of his or her death or, if not for a transfer of the
exemption pursuant to subsection 2, would have been eligible for
the exemption at the time of his or her death; and
(c) The surviving spouse has not remarried.
 The affidavit required by this subsection is in addition to the
certification required pursuant to subsections 4 and 5. After the
filing of the original affidavit required by this subsection, the county
assessor shall, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, mail
a form for renewal of the exemption to the person each year
following a year in which the exemption was allowed for that
person. The form must be designed to facilitate its return by mail by
the person claiming the exemption. If so requested by the person
claiming the exemption, the county assessor may provide the form
to the person by electronic means in lieu of by mail.
-
*AB135*

– 13 –
7. If a tax exemption is allowed under this section to a person
who qualifies for the tax exemption:
(a) As a veteran or as the current spouse of a veteran who
receives a transfer of an exemption pursuant to subsection 2, that
person is not entitled to an exemption under NRS 371.103.
(b) Solely as the surviving spouse of a veteran with a permanent
service-connected disability, the allowance of a tax exemption under
this section does not affect the eligibility of that person for an
exemption as a veteran under NRS 371.103.
8. If any person makes a false affidavit or produces false proof
to the Department, and as a result of the false affidavit or false proof
the person is allowed a tax exemption to which he or she is not
entitled, the person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
9. Beginning with the 2005-2006 Fiscal Year, the monetary
amounts in subsections 1 and 3 must be adjusted for each fiscal year
by adding to each amount the product of the amount multiplied by
the percentage increase in the consumer price inflation index from
July 2003 to the July preceding the fiscal year for which the
adjustment is calculated.
10. For the purposes of this section, “consumer price inflation
index” means the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers,
West Region (All Items), as published by the United States
Department of Labor or, if that index ceases to be published by the
United States Department of Labor, the published index selected by
the Department of Taxation pursuant to subsection 11 of
NRS 361.091.
H
-
*AB135*